California, session 20252026, SB1089.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. This act shall be known, and may be cited, as the Preventive Treatment Health Care Act.SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) There are approximately 30,000,000 adults 18 years of age and older living in California.(b) (1) According to the University of California, Los Angeles, California Health Interview Survey, nearly 61 percent of, or more than 24,500,000, California adults 18 to 64 years of age, inclusive, are suffering from chronic weight disease, thereby falling into the combined overweight or obese category.(2) The body mass index (BMI) is a formula that screens for excess weight relative to height.(3) The federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention classifies weight into six categories. The BMI formula used is categorized as follows:UnderweightBMI below 18.5Healthy weightBMI 18.5 to 24.9OverweightBMI 25.0 to 29.9Class 1 ObesityBMI 30.0 to 34.9Class 2 ObesityBMI 35.0 to 39.9Class 3 ObesityBMI 40.0 and above(4) Further, BMI is measured to determine risk for weight-related disease often associated with a waist size of 35 inches or more in women and 40 inches or more in men.(c) Californians with a greater determination of overweight beyond a BMI higher than 30.0 are clinically described as obese, which has increased from 19.3 percent in 2001 to over 29 percent in 2023. Even more alarming, without prevention, obesity could reach 41 percent by 2030 in California adults.(d) Serious chronic weight disease with a BMI formula rating over 30 is recognized as such by major medical organizations, including the American Medical Association since 2013, the American Association of Clinical Endocrinology, the American College of Cardiology, the Endocrine Society, the American Society for Reproductive Medicine, the Society for Cardiovascular Angiography and Interventions, the American Urological Association, and the American College of Surgeons.(e) (1) Chronic weight disease extends beyond the need to lose pounds but can also contribute to possible cancers and other comorbidities. From 2005 to 2014, several cancers that may be associated with chronic weight disease have increased in the United States, while cancers associated with other health factors decreased.(2) Chronic weight disease reduces a patient’s overall cancer-specific survival rate, as well as increases the risk of cancer recurrence.(3) The 13 types of cancer related to chronic weight disease are:(A) Adenocarcinoma of the esophagus.(B) Postmenopausal breast.(C) Colon and rectal, or colorectal.(D) Endometrial of the uterus.(E) Gallbladder.(F) Gastric cardia, or upper stomach.(G) Renal cell carcinoma of the kidney.(H) Liver.(I) Ovarian.(J) Pancreatic.(K) Thyroid.(L) Meningioma, a type of brain cancer.(M) Multiple myeloma, a blood cancer.(4) Chronic weight disease is associated with an increased risk of more than 200 comorbid conditions. Some of those conditions are:(A) Type 2 diabetes.(B) High blood pressure.(C) Heart disease.(D) Stroke.(E) Metabolic syndrome.(F) Fatty liver diseases.(G) Other types of cancers.(H) Breathing problems.(I) Osteoarthritis.(J) Gout.(K) Diseases of the gallbladder and pancreas.(L) Kidney disease.(M) Pregnancy problems.(N) Fertility problems.(O) Sexual function problems.(P) Mental health problems.(f) (1) In addition to individual health impacts of chronic weight disease, employee productivity and contributions to California’s economy are impacted by the prevention and management of chronic weight disease.(2) Chronic weight disease can be related to reduced labor participation and earnings and increased early mortality, absenteeism, disability, and health care costs exceeding $1 billion and a 2.6-percent reduction in the California gross domestic product.(g) Barriers to the reduction, maintenance, or elimination of chronic weight disease are essentially access and cost.(h) This act is intended to promote access to affordable glucagon-like peptide-1 (GLP-1) weight management medication for Californians.SEC. 3.Section 22853.5 is added to the Government Code, to read:22853.5.(a)Commencing January 1, 2028, a health benefit plan or contract that contracts with the board pursuant to this chapter shall offer coverage for chronic weight disease management or to treat obesity or overweight persons, including nutritional information and at least one glucagon-like peptide-1 (GLP-1) antiobesity medication approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration.(b)When determining the cost for weight disease management or treatments for obesity or overweight persons covered pursuant to subdivision (a), the cost to Medi-Cal beneficiaries in the year 2025 or better pricing may be considered.(c)Chronic weight disease management or treatments for obesity or overweight persons covered pursuant to subdivision (a) shall follow the indications for use in the label approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration.(d)For purposes of this section, a “glucagon-like peptide-1 (GLP-1) antiobesity medication approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration” includes a GLP-1, GLP-1 receptor agonist, glucose-dependent insulinotropic polypeptide plus GLP-1, GLP-1 receptor dual agonist, or tirzepatide.(e)This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2032, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 4.SEC. 3. Section 127697 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:127697. In addition to partnerships authorized pursuant to Sections 127692 and 127693, the California Health and Human Services Agency may, subject to an appropriation by the Legislature, enter into partnerships to increase competition, lower prices, and address supply shortages under any of the following circumstances:(a) For over-the-counter naloxone products. Partnerships entered into pursuant to this section may allow the development, manufacturing, or distribution of over-the-counter naloxone products by an entity that is authorized to do so under federal or state law.(b) For generic or brand name drugs to address emerging health concerns, including in reproductive health care, gender affirming health care, or at least one glucagon-like peptide-1 (GLP-1) antiobesity medication approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration. For purposes of this section, a “glucagon-like peptide-1 (GLP-1) antiobesity medication approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration” includes a GLP-1, GLP-1 receptor agonist, glucose-dependent insulinotropic polypeptide plus GLP-1, GLP-1 receptor dual agonist, or tirzepatide. The California Health and Human Services Agency shall also make its best effort to negotiate pricing at or lower than the cost to Medi-Cal beneficiaries in 2025.(c) For the development, production, procurement, or distribution of vaccines, by an entity that is authorized to do so under federal or state law, with the intent that these vaccines be made widely available to public and private purchasers, providers, suppliers, and pharmacies.(d) For the manufacture, purchase, or distribution of medical supplies or medical devices.